Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.135

Noncompliance by growers—Director may withhold services.

The director may withhold services to growers of planting stock for refusal to comply with the provisions of this chapter or its rules, for nonpayment of fees and assessment moneys owed to the department by law, or for nonpayment of any assessment moneys due to an agricultural commodity commission.

[ 1999 c 144 s 13.]